Utah statutes.
77-32-304.   Duties of assigned counsel -- Compensation.
(1) When representing an indigent, the assigned counsel shall:
(a) counsel and defend the indigent at every stage of the proceeding following
assignment; and
(b) file any first appeal of right or other remedy before or after conviction
that the assigned counsel considers to be in the interest of justice, except
for other and subsequent discretionary appeals or discretionary writ
proceedings.
(2)  An assigned counsel may not have the duty or power under this section to
represent an indigent in any discretionary appeal or action for a
discretionary writ, other than in a meaningful first appeal of right to assure
the indigent an adequate opportunity to present the indigent's claims fairly
in the context of the appellate process of this state.
(3)  An assigned counsel for an indigent shall be entitled to compensation
upon:
(a)  approval of the district court where the original trial was held;
(b)  a showing that:
(i)  the indigent has been denied a constitutional right; or
(ii)  there was newly discovered evidence that would show the indigent's
innocence; and
(c)  that the legal services rendered by counsel were:
(i)  other than that required under this chapter or under a separate fee
arrangement; and
(ii)  necessary for the indigent and not for the purpose of delaying the
judgment of the original trier of fact.
